Washington statutes.
RCW 3.38.040

Districting plan—Amendment.

(1) The districting committee may meet for the purpose of amending the districting plan at any time on call of the county legislative authority, the chairperson of the committee or a majority of its members. Amendments to the plan shall be submitted to the county legislative authority not later than March 15th of each year for adoption by the county legislative authority following the same procedure as with the original districting plan. Amendments shall be adopted not later than May 1st following submission by the districting committee. Any amendment which would reduce the salary or shorten the term of any judge shall not be effective until the next regular election for district judge. All other amendments may be effective on a date set by the county legislative authority.

(2) The districting committee shall meet within forty-five days of the effective date of changes in the number of judges to be elected in each district court district, or electoral district, if any. Amendments to the plan concerning the number of judges to be elected in each district court district, or electoral district, if any, shall be submitted to the county legislative authority not later than ninety days after the effective date of changes in RCW 3.34.010, and the amendments shall be adopted not later than one hundred eighty days after the effective date of changes in RCW 3.34.010.

[ 2003 c 97 s 5; 1984 c 258 s 27; 1969 ex.s. c 66 s 3; 1961 c 299 s 28.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2003 c 97: See note following RCW 3.34.010.

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.